Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; police and fire infrastructure upgrade and modernization The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for the following purposes: 1. $5,500,000 to distribute to the Apache Junction police department for headquarters expansion and modernization. 2. $7,000,000 to distribute to Superstition fire and medical district for fire station 265 modernization. 3. $2,000,000 to distribute to the Apache Junction police department for public safety radio interoperability upgrades.